Utah statutes.
31A-22-107.   Bond premium allowable expense of fiduciary.

Any fiduciary required by law, or the court in providing a surety to secure the fiduciary's performance, may include as part of the expense of executing the fiduciary responsibility a reasonable premium paid to a surety for becoming the fiduciary's surety.  However, the court may not allow an expense allowance greater than the larger of 1% of the surety's maximum obligation or $25.

